South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S931.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 41-16-30 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 41-16-30.  The provisions of this chapter do not apply to any facility installed in any single private dwelling residence, except as provided in Section 41-16-35, or to facilities over which an agency of the federal government is asserting similar enforcement jurisdiction. Provisions of this chapter supersede similar provisions contained in building codes of this State or of any political subdivision of this State. SECTION 2.  Chapter 16, Title 41 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 41-16-35.  The director shall conduct a final acceptance inspection upon completion of the installation, modification, or alteration of a single private dwelling residence elevator before it is placed into service. Upon the completion and final acceptance inspection of a single private dwelling residence elevator, the dwelling's owner shall register the single private dwelling elevator with the department pursuant to Section 41-16-60. The director shall create and maintain a database of single private dwelling elevators registered with the department. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----